Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 5. License Renewal

§ 33-29-501.
Renewal of licenses.

The board shall provide for the biennial renewal of a license. The board may adopt a system under which licenses are renewed on a staggered basis.

An individual whose license has expired shall not engage in activities that require a license until the license has been renewed or until a new license has been obtained.

An individual whose license has been expired for less than two (2) years may renew the license by paying the required annual renewal fee and a late fee.

An individual whose license has been expired for more than two (2) years may not renew the license. The individual may obtain a new license by complying with the requirements of this act for obtaining an original license.

An individual who renews his license shall comply with the continuing professional competency requirements adopted by board rule for license renewals.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-502.
Continuity of current licenses.

Any individual holding a certificate of registration in this state that is valid and active on July 1, 2013, shall be deemed to be licensed under this act.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)